src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON h16_2e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
			  +N+Neu:        	 S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^JI%>i	 	 Neu_Flag  ; ! hoyggi
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: 			 Neu_Flag  ; ! hoyggj
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GGDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ; ! hoynum
			  +N+Neu:^GGDEL		 S_N_SGG_s ; ! hoys
!
LEXICON h_flt16_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h_flt16 ;
!
LEXICON h16_3 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** fríggj
  h16_3e ;
  h_flt16_3 ;
!
LEXICON h16_3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Neu:        	 S_N_SGNA  ;
			  +N+Neu:^JI    	 S_N_SGD_i ; ! fríggi, frígginum
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: 			 Neu_Flag  ; ! fríggj
			  +N+Neu:^GGDEL		 S_N_SGG_s ; ! frís
!
LEXICON h_flt16_3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h_flt16 ;
!
LEXICON h17 ! kríggj
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h17e    ;
  h_flt17 ;
!
LEXICON h17e 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu:       S_N_SGNA  ;
			  +N+Neu:^JI    S_N_SGD_i ; ! skríggi, skrígginum
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:   	Neu_Flag  ; ! skríggj
			  +N+Neu:^GDEL  S_N_SGG_s ; ! skrígs!
!
LEXICON h_flt17
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h17_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h17_2e ;
 h_flt17 ;
!
LEXICON h17_2e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu:       	S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^JI%>i  	Neu_Flag  ; ! kríggi
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:   		Neu_Flag  ; ! kríggj
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ; ! krígnum
			  +N+Neu:^GDEL 		S_N_SGG_s ; ! krígs
!
LEXICON h18 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** týggi
  h18e    ;
  h_flt18 ;
!
LEXICON h18e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:i 0_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:j   		Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:inum   		Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu:%>is S_N_SGG ;
!
LEXICON h_flt18
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA_i_ir ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h19 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** prógv
  h19e    ;
  h_flt19 ;
!
LEXICON h19e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu: 			S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GDEL%>num Neu_Flag ;
 			  +N+Neu:^GDEL%>s 	S_N_SGG  ;
!
LEXICON h_flt19
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h20 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** búgv
  h20e    ;
  h_flt20 ;
!
LEXICON h20e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			 +N+Neu:        	S_N_SGNA  ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ;
 			 +N+Neu:^GVDEL 		S_N_SGG_s ;
!
LEXICON h_flt20
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h21 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** plógv
  h21e    ;
  h_flt21 ;
!
LEXICON h21e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu: 			S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^VDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ;
			  +N+Neu:^VDEL 		S_N_SGG_s ;
!
LEXICON h_flt21
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h22 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** ber
  h22e    ;
  h_flt22 ;
!
LEXICON h22e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt22
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:  N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h23 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** egg
  h23e    ;
  h_flt23 ;
!
LEXICON h23e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt23
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:  N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h24 ! kvæði
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h24e     ;
  h_flt24 ;
!
LEXICON h24e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: i_N_SGNA   ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i  ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt24
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  +N+Neu:  N_PLNA_i_ir ;
  +N+Neu:  N_PLD       ;
  +N+Neu:  N_PLG       ;
!
LEXICON h25 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** merki
  h25e    ;
  h_flt25 ;
!
LEXICON h25e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: i_N_SGNA   ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i  ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt25
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA_i_ir ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  	  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  	  ;
!
LEXICON h_flt26 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** tiðindi
  h_flt24 ;
!
LEXICON h_flt27 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** systkin
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:in  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:ini Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:in  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:ini Neu_Flag  ;
   			 +N+Neu:j 	N_PLD  	  ;
 			 +N+Neu:in 	N_PLG     ;
!
LEXICON h28 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** bakarí
  h28e    ;
  h_flt28 ;
!
LEXICON h28e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA  ; !bakarí
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD   ; ! bakarí
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i ; ! bakaríi
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGG_s ; ! bakarís
!
LEXICON h_flt28
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h29 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kamar
  h29e    ;
  h_flt29 ;
!
LEXICON h29e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:ar S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:ar S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt29
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
			 +N+Neu:^UUML%>r    N_PLD     ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>urum Neu_Flag  ;
 			 +N+Neu:ar 			N_PLG     ;
!
LEXICON h30 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** summar
			  +N+Neu:mar 	 S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:ri   	 Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:rinum 	 Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:marinum Neu_Flag  ;
 			  +N+Neu:mar 	 S_N_SGG_s ;
 			  +N+Neu:mur 	 N_PLNA    ;
 			  +N+Neu:mør 	 N_PLNA    ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:rini 	 Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:rini 	 Neu_Flag  ;
 			  +N+Neu:r 		 N_PLD     ;
 			  +N+Neu:r 		 N_PLG     ;
!
LEXICON h31 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** nummar
 			+N+Neu:mar 	 S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:rinum Neu_Flag    ;
 			+N+Neu:mar   S_N_SGDG_is ;
 			+N+Neu:mar   N_PLNA      ;
 			+N+Neu:mur   N_PLNA      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:rini  Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:rini  Neu_Flag    ;
		    +N+Neu:r 	 N_PLD       ;
 		    +N+Neu:r 	 N_PLG       ;
!
LEXICON h32 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** høvd
 +N+Neu:d  S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu:d  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:uð S_N_SGG_s ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLNA    ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLD     ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLG     ;
!
LEXICON h33 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** høvur
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:dið Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:dið Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu:d  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:uð S_N_SGG_s ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:dini Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:ur Neu_Flag   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:dini Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLD     ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLG     ;
!
LEXICON h34 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** fæ
h34e ;
h_flt34 ;
!
LEXICON h34e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Neu:æ S_N_SGNA    ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:æi Neu_Flag 		; ! fæi
 			 +N+Neu:æ  S_N_SGD  		; ! fæ, fænum
+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:íggjar Neu_Flag 	; ! fíggjar
  +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:íggjarsins Neu_Flag ; ! fíggjarsins

! møguliga skal h_flt34 strikast  

LEXICON h_flt34
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Neu:æ N_PLNA      ;
+N+Neu:æ N_PLD       ;
+N+Neu:æ N_PLG       ;

! Leksikona h35 til og med h41 er __ikkje__ ferdig.

LEXICON h3e/kv2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h3e ;
 kv2 ;

LEXICON h36
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h36e ;
 h_flt36 ;

LEXICON h36e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:um Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:ið Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:um Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:ið Neu_Flag  ;
              +N+Neu:   S_N_SGD_i ;
              +N+Neu:i  S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON h_flt36
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:i   Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:ir  Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:ini Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:i   Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:ir  Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:ini Neu_Flag ;
              +N+Neu:    N_PLD    ;
              +N+Neu:    N_PLG    ;

LEXICON h37
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  h37e    ;
  h_flt37 ;
