src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
vil+CmpNP/None:vil h_flt22 ;
LEXICON Nouns
justitsministerium:justits#ministeri h36 ;
proprium:propri h36 ;
rossatjógv:rossatjógv h20 ;
alnartjógv:alnartjógv h20 ;
rógv:rógv h20 ;
trotabúgv:trotabúgv h20 ;
vattasummar:vatta#sum h30 ;
midsummar:mid#sum h30 ;
brimsummar:brim#sum h30 ;
plógv:plógv h21 ;
syllaplógv:syllaplógv h21 ;
nummar:num h31 ;
telefonnummar:telefon#num h31 ;
røðilsnummar:røðils#num h31 ;
postnummar:post#num h31 ;
rukkufyl:rukkufyl h22 ;
sólber:sólber h22 ;
sleivarker:sleivarker h22 ;
miðriv:miðriv h22 ;
bismarahøvd:bismara#høv h32 ;
trøllhøvd:trøll#høv h32 ;
ærhøvd:ær#høv h32 ;
likkegg:likkegg h23 ;
antaregg:antaregg h23 ;
súluegg:súluegg h23 ;
neytahøvur:neyta#høv h33 ;
livurhøvur:livur#høv h33 ;
manshøvur:mans#høv h33 ;
súluhøvur:súlu#høv h33 ;
sanatorii:sanatori h37 ;
grónhøvd:grón#høv h32 ;
yvirpresidium:yvir#presidi h36 ;
decennium:decenni h36 ;
ambulatorii:ambulatori h37 ;
grón:grón h3e/kv2 ;
illveðurssummar:ill#veðurs#sum h30 ;
krossnev:kross#nev h22 ;
kolakógv:kola#kógv h19e ;
kavakógv:kava#kógv h19e ;
studentaprógv:studenta#prógv h19 ;
innbúgv:inn#búgv h20 ;
hálmaskrúgv:hálma#skrúgv h19 ;
førleikafæ:før#leika#f h34e ;
glantarí:glantarí h28 ;
umvæli:umvæl h24 ;
lomvigakneppi:lomvigaknepp h24 ;
flotbelti:flotbelt h24 ;
samarbeiði:samarbeið h24 ;
almannafæ:almanna#f h34e ;
leysafæ:leysa#f h34 ;
loysifæ:loysi#f h34 ;
festarfæ:festar#f h34 ;
ránsfæ:ráns#f h34 ;
hýggj:hýggj h16_3 ;
útstrekki:útstrekk h25 ;
fylki:fylk h25 ;
díki:dík h25 ;
lísvýki:lísvýk h25e ;
hapurtýggi:hapur#týgg h18 ;
grasfeingi:gras#feing h25e ;
jarðfeingi:jarð#feing h25e ;
himmiriki:himmi#rik h25e ;
eftirfylgi:eftirfylg h_flt25 ;
soltistykki:soltistykk h_flt25 ;
stroyggj:stroyggj h16_3 ;
fríggj:fríggj h16_3 ;
tjørusíggj:tjøru#síggj h16_3 ;
fiskadeiggj:fiskadeiggj h17 ;
reiggj:reiggj h17 ;
rummarareiggj:rummarareiggj h17 ;
villaveiggj:villaveiggj h17 ;
viðsveiggj:viðsveiggj h17 ;
kríggj:kríggj h17_2 ;
borgarakríggj:borgara#kríggj h17_2 ;
nervakríggj:nerva#kríggj h17_2 ;
frælsiskríggj:frælsis#kríggj h17_2 ;
verðinskríggj:verðins#kríggj h17_2 ;
systkin:systk h_flt27 ;
spælisystkin:spæli#systk h_flt27 ;
samsystkin:sam#systk h_flt27 ;
fostursystkin:fostur#systk h_flt27 ;
kollegii:kollegi h37 ;
sanatorii:sanatori h37 ;
skyggi:skygg h18 ;
tríggi:trígg h18 ;
pýggi:pýgg h18 ;
ótýggi:ó#týgg h18 ;
óhyggi:ó#hygg h_flt18 ;
rossatýggi:rossa#týgg h_flt18 ;
aktýggi:ak#týgg h_flt18 ;
skeldarí:skeldarí h28 ;
málarí:málarí h28 ;
reiðarí:reiðarí h28 ;
váknaprógv:váknaprógv h19 ;
sannprógv:sannprógv h19 ;
studentsprógv:studentsprógv h19 ;
kamar:ka3m h29 ;
loynikamar:loyni#ka3m h29 ;
seingjarkamar:seingjar#ka3m h29 ;
loftskamar:lofts#ka3m h29 ;
lokkatógv:lokkatógv h20e ;
ormatógv:ormatógv h20e ;
rossatógv:rossatógv h20e ;
rubbitógv:rubbitógv h20e ;
skipstroyggjutógv:skipstroyggjutógv h20e ;
slógv:slógv h21e ;
fiskaslógv:fiskaslógv h21e ;
mannkyn:mannkyn h22e ;
felagskyn:felagskyn h22e ;
tilvísingarkyn:tilvísingarkyn h22e ;
manskyn:manskyn h22e ;
sárlyndi:sárlynd h24e ;
fegni:fegn h24e ;
piprilsi:piprils h24e ;
eyrgrýti:eyrgrýt h24e ;
arvafæ:arva#f h34e ;
barnahoyggj:barna#hoyggj h16_2e ;
tarvahoyggj:tarva#hoyggj h16_2e ;
útihoyggj:úti#hoyggj h16_2e ;
seingjarhoyggj:seingjar#hoyggj h16_2e ;
bøhoyggj:bø#hoyggj h16_2e ;
royðrarroyggj:royðrar#royggj h16_3e ;
víggj:víggj h16_3e ;
marramýggj:marra#mýggj h16_3e ;
matarmýggj:matar#mýggj h16_3e ;
hvalspýggj:hval#spýggj h16_3 ;
strýggj:strýggj h16_3e ;
smørdeiggj:smørdeiggj h17e ;
blóðmørsdeiggj:blóðmørsdeiggj h17e ;
tertudeiggj:tertudeiggj h17e ;
omanfleyggj:omanfleyggj h17e ;
víggj:víggj h17e ;
seiggi:seigg h18e ;
sjerri:sjerri h28e ;
spøkjarí:spøkjarí h28e ;
fiskarí:fiskarí h28e ;
slavarí:slavarí h28e ;
brosmuhógv:brosmuhógv h19e ;
óhógv:óhógv h19e ;
sógv:sógv h19e ;
farlíkindi:farlíkind h_flt26 ;
lunnindi:lunnind h_flt26 ;
útrakstrarrættindi:útrakstrarrættind h_flt26 ;
veðurtíðindi:veðurtíðind h_flt26 ;
rossaklæði:rossaklæð h_flt24 ;
hampingarklæði:hampingarklæð h_flt24 ;
skarlaksklæði:skarlaksklæð h_flt24 ;
kirkjuklæði:kirkjuklæð h_flt24 ;
hønuegg:hønu#egg h23 ;
vakstrarøki:vakstrar#øk h25 ;
